Tennessee, session 114, HB2532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3502(7), is amended by adding
"any of the grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12) at" after "enrolls in".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3504, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (f):
(f) Notwithstanding subsection (b) and subject to appropriation, the department
shall make a maximum of forty thousand (40,000) scholarships available to eligible
students for the 2026-2027 school year in the order required in subsection (c).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 35, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
49-6-3513. Tennessee's participation in The One, Big, Beautiful Bill Act.
(a) It is the intent of the general assembly that this state participate in the federal
education tax credit program created in The One, Big, Beautiful Bill Act.
(b) By December 31, 2026, the governor shall elect to participate in the federal
education tax credit program created in The One, Big, Beautiful Bill Act, 26 U.S.C. §
25F. After electing to participate in the program, the governor shall comply with any and
all requirements to maintain the state's participation in the program.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect on becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2532
011713
- 1 -